Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.065

Bylaws—Submission to director.

(1) Persons applying for the organization of a credit union shall adopt bylaws that prescribe the manner in which the business of the credit union shall be conducted. The bylaws shall include:

(a) The name of the credit union;

(b) The field of membership of the credit union;

(c) Reasonable qualifications for admission as a member of the credit union, and the procedures for expelling a member;

(d) The number of directors and supervisory committee members, and the length of terms they serve and the permissible term length of any interim director or supervisory committee member;

(e) Any qualification for eligibility to serve on the credit union's board or supervisory committee;

(f) The number of credit union employees that may serve on the board, if any;

(g) The frequency of regular meetings of the board and the supervisory committee, and the manner in which members of the board or supervisory committee will be notified of meetings;

(h) The timing of the annual membership meeting;

(i) The manner in which members may call a special membership meeting;

(j) The manner in which members will be notified of membership meetings;

(k) The number of members constituting a quorum at a membership meeting;

(l) Provisions, if any, for the indemnification of directors, supervisory committee members, officers, employees, and others by the credit union, if not included in the articles of incorporation; and

(m) Any other provision which is not inconsistent with this chapter.

(2) Applicants shall submit the bylaws in duplicate to the director.

[ 2017 c 61 s 3; 2001 c 83 s 2; 1997 c 397 s 7. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 72; 1994 c 92 s 180; 1984 c 31 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.